Montana, session 2025, HB383.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Campaign electronic reporting system -- files and reports -- search
results. The campaign electronic reporting system must provide a unique uniform resource locator or web
address for each file and report maintained and each search result produced by the system.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 13, chapter 37, part 2, and the provisions of Title 13, chapter 37, part 2, apply to [section 1].

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 383